Maryland, session 2026, HB0543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
9.5–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) “Family child care home” means a residence in which family child care is
provided for up to eight children.
Article – Real Property
8–203.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a landlord may
not impose a security deposit in excess of the equivalent of 1 month’s rent per dwelling unit,
regardless of the number of tenants.
(2) A landlord may impose a security deposit in an amount equivalent to
up to 2 months’ rent if:
(i) 1. The tenant is eligible and has qualified for utility
assistance through the Department of Human Services;
[(ii)] 2. The lease agreement requires that the tenant make
payments for utility services directly to the landlord; and
[(iii)] 3. The tenant and landlord agree in writing to the amount of
the security deposit; OR
(II) THE TENANT OPERATES OR PLANS TO OPERATE A FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE ON THE LEASED PREMISES.
(3) If a landlord violates paragraph (1) of this subsection, the tenant may
recover up to three times the extra amount charged, plus reasonable attorney’s fees.

HOUSE BILL 543 3
(4) An action under this section may be brought at any time during the
tenancy or within 2 years after its termination.
8–222.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME” HAS THE MEANING
STATED IN § 9.5–301 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE LEASE OF A SINGLE–FAMILY
DWELLING TO A TENANT OR PROSPECTIVE TENANT FOR USE OF THE LEASED
PREMISES AS A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO:
(I) THE LEASE OF AN OWNER–OCCUPIED SINGLE–FAMILY
DWELLING; OR
(II) PROHIBITIONS AGAINST OR RESTRICTIONS ON FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOMES IMPOSED BY:
1. AGE–RELATED RESTRICTIONS OF A HOMEOWNERS
ASSOCIATION; OR
2. THE GOVERNING DOCUMENTS OR BYLAWS OF A
CONDOMINIUM OR COOPERATIVE HOUSING CORPORATION.
(2) A LANDLORD OF A SINGLE–FAMILY DWELLING MAY NOT PROHIBIT
A TENANT OR PROSPECTIVE TENANT FROM OPERATING A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME
ON THE LEASED PREMISES BY:
(I) REFUSING TO OFFER THE PREMISES FOR LEASE,
NEGOTIATE THE LEASE OF THE PREMISES, OR LEASE THE PREMISES;
(II) IMPOSING UNREASONABLE LIMITATIONS OR CONDITIONS
ON THE USE OF THE LEASED PREMISES AS A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME; OR
(III) OTHERWISE ACTING IN BAD FAITH TO PREVENT THE USE OF
THE LEASED PREMISES AS A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(D) A LANDLORD IS NOT LIABLE FOR ANY ACT OR OMISSION OF A TENANT
RELATING TO THE OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(E) A TENANT SHALL NOTIFY A LANDLORD IN WRITING AT LEAST 60 DAYS
PRIOR TO OPERATING A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME ON THE LEASED PREMISES.

HOUSE BILL 543
(F) (1) PRIOR TO COMMENCING THE OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD
CARE HOME, A TENANT SHALL PROVIDE THE LANDLORD WITH:
(I) THE TENANT’S REGISTRATION TO OPERATE A FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME ISSUED UNDER TITLE 9.5, SUBTITLE 3 OF THE EDUCATION
ARTICLE; AND
(II) A CERTIFICATE OF INSURANCE NAMING THE FOLLOWING AS
ADDITIONAL INSUREDS ON POLICIES RELATING TO THE OPERATION OF THE FAMILY
CHILD CARE HOME:
1. THE LANDLORD; AND
2. EACH ENTITY WITH A DIRECT OR INDIRECT
OWNERSHIP OR MEMBERSHIP INTEREST IN THE PROPERTY.
(2) IF THE TENANT CEASES OPERATION OF THE FAMILY CHILD CARE
HOME, THE TENANT SHALL NOTIFY THE LANDLORD IMMEDIATELY.
(3) A LANDLORD MAY REQUIRE A TENANT TO PURCHASE A LIABILITY
INSURANCE POLICY WITH COVERAGE LIMITS OF NOT MORE THAN $1,000,000 IN
CONNECTION WITH THE TENANT’S OPERATION OF A FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME.
(4) IF THERE IS A LAPSE IN COVERAGE ON A POLICY UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE TENANT SHALL CEASE OPERATION OF
THE FAMILY CHILD CARE HOME FOR THE DURATION OF THE LAPSE.
(G) THIS SECTION DOES NOT LIMIT OR PREEMPT THE LOCAL ZONING
AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any lease entered into before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.